Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.763

Risk management—Definitions.

As used in chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.:

(1) "Department" means the department of enterprise services;

(2) "Director" means the director of enterprise services;

(3) "Risk management" means the total effort and continuous step by step process of risk identification, measurement, minimization, assumption, transfer, and loss adjustment which is aimed at protecting assets and revenues against accidental loss; and

(4) "State agency" includes any state office, agency, commission, department, or institution, including colleges, universities, and community colleges, financed in whole or part from funds appropriated by the legislature.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 501; 1977 ex.s. c 270 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.41.290, 43.19.19363.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—2002 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.760.